Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB391.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.187 is amended to read as follows:
If a person sells less than five hundred (500)[one hundred fifty (150)] gallons of pure and unadulterated honey in a
year that he or she produced in Kentucky[ off the farm], the person shall not be required to process the honey in a
certified honey house or food processing establishment, nor shall the person be required to obtain a permit from the
cabinet. The person shall be required to comply with the other provisions of KRS 217.005 to 217.215 as those
provisions apply.
Signed by Governor March 15, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version